Illinois, session 104th, SB2249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 514-2 and 14-8.02 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-2)7    Sec. 14-2. Definition of general education classroom for 8special education students receiving services in the general 9education classroom.10    (a) With respect to any State statute or administrative 11rule that defines a general education classroom to be composed 12of a certain percentage of students with individualized 13education programs (IEPs), students with individualized 14education programs shall exclude students receiving only 15speech services outside of the general education classroom, 16provided that the instruction the students receive in the 17general education classroom does not require modification.18    (b) In every instance, a school district must ensure that 19composition of the general education classroom does not 20interfere with the provision of a free and appropriate public 21education to any student.22    (c) Any student with an individualized education program 23shall receive services in general education classrooms in the   SB2249- 2 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1local school building that the child would attend if the child 2did not require special educational services. 3(Source: P.A. 97-284, eff. 8-9-11.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/14-8.02)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-8.02)5    Sec. 14-8.02. Identification, evaluation, and placement of 6children. 7    (a) The State Board of Education shall make rules under 8which local school boards shall determine the eligibility of 9children to receive special education. Such rules shall ensure 10that a free appropriate public education be available to all 11children with disabilities as defined in Section 14-1.02 and 12that any child with a disability who has not been removed from 13the regular educational environment in accordance with 14paragraph (d) of this Section shall receive educational 15services and special educational services at the local school 16building that the child would attend if the child did not 17require special educational services. The State Board of 18Education shall require local school districts to administer 19non-discriminatory procedures or tests to English learners 20coming from homes in which a language other than English is 21used to determine their eligibility to receive special 22education. The placement of low English proficiency students 23in special education programs and facilities shall be made in 24accordance with the test results reflecting the student's 25linguistic, cultural and special education needs. For purposes   SB2249- 3 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1of determining the eligibility of children the State Board of 2Education shall include in the rules definitions of "case 3study", "staff conference", "individualized educational 4program", and "qualified specialist" appropriate to each 5category of children with disabilities as defined in this 6Article. For purposes of determining the eligibility of 7children from homes in which a language other than English is 8used, the State Board of Education shall include in the rules 9definitions for "qualified bilingual specialists" and 10"linguistically and culturally appropriate individualized 11educational programs". For purposes of this Section, as well 12as Sections 14-8.02a, 14-8.02b, and 14-8.02c of this Code, 13"parent" means a parent as defined in the federal Individuals 14with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1401(23)). 15    (b) No child shall be eligible for special education 16facilities except with a carefully completed case study fully 17reviewed by professional personnel in a multidisciplinary 18staff conference and only upon the recommendation of qualified 19specialists or a qualified bilingual specialist, if available. 20At the conclusion of the multidisciplinary staff conference, 21the parent of the child and, if the child is in the legal 22custody of the Department of Children and Family Services, the 23Department's Office of Education and Transition Services shall 24be given a copy of the multidisciplinary conference summary 25report and recommendations, which includes options considered, 26and, in the case of the parent, be informed of his or her right   SB2249- 4 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1to obtain an independent educational evaluation if he or she 2disagrees with the evaluation findings conducted or obtained 3by the school district. If the school district's evaluation is 4shown to be inappropriate, the school district shall reimburse 5the parent for the cost of the independent evaluation. The 6State Board of Education shall, with advice from the State 7Advisory Council on Education of Children with Disabilities on 8the inclusion of specific independent educational evaluators, 9prepare a list of suggested independent educational 10evaluators. The State Board of Education shall include on the 11list clinical psychologists licensed pursuant to the Clinical 12Psychologist Licensing Act. Such psychologists shall not be 13paid fees in excess of the amount that would be received by a 14school psychologist for performing the same services. The 15State Board of Education shall supply school districts with 16such list and make the list available to parents at their 17request. School districts shall make the list available to 18parents at the time they are informed of their right to obtain 19an independent educational evaluation. However, the school 20district may initiate an impartial due process hearing under 21this Section within 5 days of any written parent request for an 22independent educational evaluation to show that its evaluation 23is appropriate. If the final decision is that the evaluation 24is appropriate, the parent still has a right to an independent 25educational evaluation, but not at public expense. An 26independent educational evaluation at public expense must be   SB2249- 5 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1completed within 30 days of a parent's written request unless 2the school district initiates an impartial due process hearing 3or the parent or school district offers reasonable grounds to 4show that such 30-day time period should be extended. If the 5due process hearing decision indicates that the parent is 6entitled to an independent educational evaluation, it must be 7completed within 30 days of the decision unless the parent or 8the school district offers reasonable grounds to show that 9such 30-day period should be extended. If a parent disagrees 10with the summary report or recommendations of the 11multidisciplinary conference or the findings of any 12educational evaluation which results therefrom, the school 13district shall not proceed with a placement based upon such 14evaluation and the child shall remain in his or her regular 15classroom setting. No child shall be eligible for admission to 16a special class for children with a mental disability who are 17educable or for children with a mental disability who are 18trainable except with a psychological evaluation and 19recommendation by a school psychologist. Consent shall be 20obtained from the parent of a child before any evaluation is 21conducted. If consent is not given by the parent or if the 22parent disagrees with the findings of the evaluation, then the 23school district may initiate an impartial due process hearing 24under this Section. The school district may evaluate the child 25if that is the decision resulting from the impartial due 26process hearing and the decision is not appealed or if the   SB2249- 6 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1decision is affirmed on appeal. The determination of 2eligibility shall be made and the IEP meeting shall be 3completed within 60 school days from the date of written 4parental consent. In those instances when written parental 5consent is obtained with fewer than 60 pupil attendance days 6left in the school year, the eligibility determination shall 7be made and the IEP meeting shall be completed prior to the 8first day of the following school year. Special education and 9related services must be provided in accordance with the 10student's IEP no later than 10 school attendance days after 11notice is provided to the parents pursuant to Section 300.503 12of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and 13implementing rules adopted by the State Board of Education. 14The appropriate program pursuant to the individualized 15educational program of students whose native tongue is a 16language other than English shall reflect the special 17education, cultural and linguistic needs. No later than 18September 1, 1993, the State Board of Education shall 19establish standards for the development, implementation and 20monitoring of appropriate bilingual special individualized 21educational programs. The State Board of Education shall 22further incorporate appropriate monitoring procedures to 23verify implementation of these standards. The district shall 24indicate to the parent, the State Board of Education, and, if 25applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 26Transition Services the nature of the services the child will   SB2249- 7 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1receive for the regular school term while awaiting placement 2in the appropriate special education class. At the child's 3initial IEP meeting and at each annual review meeting, the 4child's IEP team shall provide the child's parent or guardian 5and, if applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 6Transition Services with a written notification that informs 7the parent or guardian or the Department's Office of Education 8and Transition Services that the IEP team is required to 9consider whether the child requires assistive technology in 10order to receive free, appropriate public education. The 11notification must also include a toll-free telephone number 12and internet address for the State's assistive technology 13program. 14    If the child is deaf, hard of hearing, blind, or visually 15impaired or has an orthopedic impairment or physical 16disability and he or she might be eligible to receive services 17from the Illinois School for the Deaf, the Illinois School for 18the Visually Impaired, or the Illinois Center for 19Rehabilitation and Education-Roosevelt, the school district 20shall notify the parents, in writing, of the existence of 21these schools and the services they provide and shall make a 22reasonable effort to inform the parents of the existence of 23other, local schools that provide similar services and the 24services that these other schools provide. This notification 25shall include, without limitation, information on school 26services, school admissions criteria, and school contact   SB2249- 8 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1information.2    In the development of the individualized education program 3for a student who has a disability on the autism spectrum 4(which includes autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, 5pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified, 6childhood disintegrative disorder, and Rett Syndrome, as 7defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 8Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV, 2000)), the IEP team shall 9consider all of the following factors:10        (1) The verbal and nonverbal communication needs of 11    the child.12        (2) The need to develop social interaction skills and 13    proficiencies.14        (3) The needs resulting from the child's unusual 15    responses to sensory experiences.16        (4) The needs resulting from resistance to 17    environmental change or change in daily routines.18        (5) The needs resulting from engagement in repetitive 19    activities and stereotyped movements.20        (6) The need for any positive behavioral 21    interventions, strategies, and supports to address any 22    behavioral difficulties resulting from autism spectrum 23    disorder.24        (7) Other needs resulting from the child's disability 25    that impact progress in the general curriculum, including 26    social and emotional development.  SB2249- 9 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1Public Act 95-257 does not create any new entitlement to a 2service, program, or benefit, but must not affect any 3entitlement to a service, program, or benefit created by any 4other law. 5    If the student may be eligible to participate in the 6Home-Based Support Services Program for Adults with Mental 7Disabilities authorized under the Developmental Disability and 8Mental Disability Services Act upon becoming an adult, the 9student's individualized education program shall include plans 10for (i) determining the student's eligibility for those 11home-based services, (ii) enrolling the student in the program 12of home-based services, and (iii) developing a plan for the 13student's most effective use of the home-based services after 14the student becomes an adult and no longer receives special 15educational services under this Article. The plans developed 16under this paragraph shall include specific actions to be 17taken by specified individuals, agencies, or officials.18    (c) In the development of the individualized education 19program for a student who is functionally blind, it shall be 20presumed that proficiency in Braille reading and writing is 21essential for the student's satisfactory educational progress. 22For purposes of this subsection, the State Board of Education 23shall determine the criteria for a student to be classified as 24functionally blind. Students who are not currently identified 25as functionally blind who are also entitled to Braille 26instruction include: (i) those whose vision loss is so severe   SB2249- 10 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1that they are unable to read and write at a level comparable to 2their peers solely through the use of vision, and (ii) those 3who show evidence of progressive vision loss that may result 4in functional blindness. Each student who is functionally 5blind shall be entitled to Braille reading and writing 6instruction that is sufficient to enable the student to 7communicate with the same level of proficiency as other 8students of comparable ability. Instruction should be provided 9to the extent that the student is physically and cognitively 10able to use Braille. Braille instruction may be used in 11combination with other special education services appropriate 12to the student's educational needs. The assessment of each 13student who is functionally blind for the purpose of 14developing the student's individualized education program 15shall include documentation of the student's strengths and 16weaknesses in Braille skills. Each person assisting in the 17development of the individualized education program for a 18student who is functionally blind shall receive information 19describing the benefits of Braille instruction. The 20individualized education program for each student who is 21functionally blind shall specify the appropriate learning 22medium or media based on the assessment report.23    (d) To the maximum extent appropriate, the placement shall 24provide the child with the opportunity to be educated with 25children who do not have a disability; provided that children 26with disabilities who are recommended to be placed into   SB2249- 11 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1regular education classrooms are provided with supplementary 2services to assist the children with disabilities to benefit 3from the regular classroom instruction and are included on the 4teacher's regular education class register. Subject to the 5limitation of the preceding sentence, placement in special 6classes, separate schools or other removal of the child with a 7disability from the regular educational environment shall 8occur only when the nature of the severity of the disability is 9such that education in the regular classes with the use of 10supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved 11satisfactorily. The placement of English learners with 12disabilities shall be in non-restrictive environments which 13provide for integration with peers who do not have 14disabilities in bilingual classrooms. Annually, each January, 15school districts shall report data on students from 16non-English speaking backgrounds receiving special education 17and related services in public and private facilities as 18prescribed in Section 2-3.30. If there is a disagreement 19between parties involved regarding the special education 20placement of any child, either in-state or out-of-state, the 21placement is subject to impartial due process procedures 22described in Article 10 of the Rules and Regulations to Govern 23the Administration and Operation of Special Education.24    (e) No child who comes from a home in which a language 25other than English is the principal language used may be 26assigned to any class or program under this Article until he   SB2249- 12 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1has been given, in the principal language used by the child and 2used in his home, tests reasonably related to his cultural 3environment. All testing and evaluation materials and 4procedures utilized for evaluation and placement shall not be 5linguistically, racially or culturally discriminatory.6    (f) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require 7any child to undergo any physical examination or medical 8treatment whose parents object thereto on the grounds that 9such examination or treatment conflicts with his religious 10beliefs.11    (g) School boards or their designee shall provide to the 12parents of a child or, if applicable, the Department of 13Children and Family Services' Office of Education and 14Transition Services prior written notice of any decision (a) 15proposing to initiate or change, or (b) refusing to initiate 16or change, the identification, evaluation, or educational 17placement of the child or the provision of a free appropriate 18public education to their child, and the reasons therefor. For 19a parent, such written notification shall also inform the 20parent of the opportunity to present complaints with respect 21to any matter relating to the educational placement of the 22student, or the provision of a free appropriate public 23education and to have an impartial due process hearing on the 24complaint. The notice shall inform the parents in the parents' 25native language, unless it is clearly not feasible to do so, of 26their rights and all procedures available pursuant to this Act   SB2249- 13 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 2Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446); it shall be the 3responsibility of the State Superintendent to develop uniform 4notices setting forth the procedures available under this Act 5and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 6Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446) to be used by all 7school boards. The notice shall also inform the parents of the 8availability upon request of a list of free or low-cost legal 9and other relevant services available locally to assist 10parents in initiating an impartial due process hearing. The 11State Superintendent shall revise the uniform notices required 12by this subsection (g) to reflect current law and procedures 13at least once every 2 years. Any parent who is deaf or does not 14normally communicate using spoken English and who participates 15in a meeting with a representative of a local educational 16agency for the purposes of developing an individualized 17educational program or attends a multidisciplinary conference 18shall be entitled to the services of an interpreter. The State 19Board of Education must adopt rules to establish the criteria, 20standards, and competencies for a bilingual language 21interpreter who attends an individualized education program 22meeting under this subsection to assist a parent who has 23limited English proficiency. 24    (g-5) For purposes of this subsection (g-5), "qualified 25professional" means an individual who holds credentials to 26evaluate the child in the domain or domains for which an   SB2249- 14 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1evaluation is sought or an intern working under the direct 2supervision of a qualified professional, including a master's 3or doctoral degree candidate.4    To ensure that a parent can participate fully and 5effectively with school personnel in the development of 6appropriate educational and related services for his or her 7child, the parent, an independent educational evaluator, or a 8qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a parent or 9child must be afforded reasonable access to educational 10facilities, personnel, classrooms, and buildings and to the 11child as provided in this subsection (g-5). The requirements 12of this subsection (g-5) apply to any public school facility, 13building, or program and to any facility, building, or program 14supported in whole or in part by public funds. Prior to 15visiting a school, school building, or school facility, the 16parent, independent educational evaluator, or qualified 17professional may be required by the school district to inform 18the building principal or supervisor in writing of the 19proposed visit, the purpose of the visit, and the approximate 20duration of the visit. The visitor and the school district 21shall arrange the visit or visits at times that are mutually 22agreeable. Visitors shall comply with school safety, security, 23and visitation policies at all times. School district 24visitation policies must not conflict with this subsection 25(g-5). Visitors shall be required to comply with the 26requirements of applicable privacy laws, including those laws   SB2249- 15 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1protecting the confidentiality of education records such as 2the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and the 3Illinois School Student Records Act. The visitor shall not 4disrupt the educational process.5        (1) A parent must be afforded reasonable access of 6    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of observing 7    his or her child in the child's current educational 8    placement, services, or program or for the purpose of 9    visiting an educational placement or program proposed for 10    the child.11        (2) An independent educational evaluator or a 12    qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a 13    parent or child must be afforded reasonable access of 14    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of 15    conducting an evaluation of the child, the child's 16    performance, the child's current educational program, 17    placement, services, or environment, or any educational 18    program, placement, services, or environment proposed for 19    the child, including interviews of educational personnel, 20    child observations, assessments, tests or assessments of 21    the child's educational program, services, or placement or 22    of any proposed educational program, services, or 23    placement. If one or more interviews of school personnel 24    are part of the evaluation, the interviews must be 25    conducted at a mutually agreed-upon time, date, and place 26    that do not interfere with the school employee's school   SB2249- 16 -LRB104 09498 LNS 19559 b1    duties. The school district may limit interviews to 2    personnel having information relevant to the child's 3    current educational services, program, or placement or to 4    a proposed educational service, program, or placement.5    (h) In the development of the individualized education 6program or federal Section 504 plan for a student, if the 7student needs extra accommodation during emergencies, 8including natural disasters or an active shooter situation, 9then that accommodation shall be taken into account when 10developing the student's individualized education program or 11federal Section 504 plan. 12(Source: P.A. 102-199, eff. 7-1-22; 102-264, eff. 8-6-21; 13102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1072, eff. 146-10-22; 103-197, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)